Wyoming, session 2026, HB0075.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 40-32-101 through 40-32-103 are
created to read:
CHAPTER 32
VIRTUAL CURRENCY KIOSKS
40-32-101. Definitions.
(a) As used in this chapter:
(i) "Commissioner" means the state banking
commissioner;
(ii) "Financial institution" means as defined in
W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix);
(iii) "Virtual currency" means as defined in
W.S. 34-29-101(a)(iv);
(iv) "Virtual currency kiosk" means a publicly
accessible electronic terminal acting as a mechanical agent
of a person to enable members of the public to facilitate
the exchange of virtual currency for money, bank credit or
other virtual currency, including by:
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0075
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(A) Connecting directly to a separate
virtual currency exchange that performs the actual virtual
currency transmission; or
(B) Drawing upon the virtual currency in
the possession of the electronic terminal's operator.
40-32-102. Virtual currency kiosks authorized;
regulation; penalty.
(a) No person shall own, operate or manage a virtual
currency kiosk in this state unless the person:
(i) Has been issued a license under the Wyoming
Money Transmitters Act, W.S. 40-22-101 through 40-22-129;
or
(ii) Is a financial institution and has been
granted a charter under title 13 of the Wyoming statutes.
(b) Any person who knowingly violates subsection (a)
of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for not less than three (3) years, a fine of
not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.
(c) The commissioner shall adopt rules regulating the
operation of virtual currency kiosks by persons authorized
under this section.
40-32-103. Confidentiality of records; exception.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, all information or reports obtained by the
commissioner relating to the operation of a virtual
currency kiosk from a person who has been issued a license
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0075
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
under the Wyoming Money Transmitters Act, W.S. 40-22-101
through 40-22-129, a financial institution that has been
granted a charter under title 13 of the Wyoming statutes or
a person acting on behalf thereof, shall be confidential.
(b) The commissioner may disclose confidential
information to officials and examiners of other states,
federal regulatory authorities, appropriate prosecuting
attorneys or as required by court order.
Section 2. Any person owning, operating or managing a
virtual currency kiosk in this state on the effective date
of this act shall comply with this act beginning on the
effective date of this act.
Section 3. The banking commissioner shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0075
ENROLLED ACT NO. 19, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4